FST/slp/morph_slp_participle.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%+V.PTCP
%+LGSPEC01
%+LGSPEC02
%+SPRL

LEXICON Root
baʔa participle;
taʔa participle;
kvaʔi participle;
lereʔ participle;
belǝʔ participle;
mǝkoʔ participle;
kpǝsuʔ participle;
blahaʔ participle;
kleaʔ participle;
mara participle;
buraʔ participle;
meʔa participle;
blega participle;
krubu participle;
gə̃ participle;
milə̃ participle;
sǝnə̃ participle;
briŋĩ participle;
belə̃ʔ participle;
blahaʔ participle;
kreʔ participle;
baʔa participle;
bloloʔ participle;
beləʔ participle;
kpǝsuʔ participle;
lereʔ participle;
nureʔ participle;
mara participle;
sǝna participle;
mǝkoʔ participle;
meʔa participle;
buraʔ participle;
taʔa participle;
blǝma participle;
klea participle;
kwaʔi participle;
koboroto participle;
ktǝgǝ participle;
kmelu participle;
plate participle;
loʔi participle;
bera participle;
milə participle;
blega participle;
knipu participle;
gə̃ participle;
wə̃hə̃ participle;
sǝnə̃ participle;

LEXICON participle
%+V.PTCP:0 lgspec-bare;
%+V.PTCP:0 spatial;

LEXICON lgspec-bare;
%+LGSPEC01 #;
%+LGSPEC02 #;

LEXICON spatial
%SPRL:0 lgspec-spatial;

LEXICON lgspec-spatial;
%+LGSPEC01 #;
%+LGSPEC02 #;
